test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuj_gt-norm.yaml
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: туйяснысла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: туйяссяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: туйясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: туйяссьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: туйясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: туйясныслань
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: туйясланьныс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: туйяссяньныс
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: туйясӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: туйястіныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: туйясӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: туйясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: туйясланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: туйясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: туйясланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: туйясланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: туйясланьтіныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: туйясланьӧдзныс
